North Carolina statutes. Chapter 76A. Navigation and Pilotage Commissions.
Article 5. Pilots.

§ 76A-42.
Apprentices.

The Commission when it deems necessary for the best interest of the State is hereby authorized to appoint in its discretion apprentices, none of whom shall be less than 21 nor more than 35 years of age, and to make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations relating thereto. Apprentices shall serve for a minimum of one year but no longer than three years in order to be eligible for a limited license. The Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to monitor the progress of apprentices on a regular basis to assure the progressive development of knowledge and skill necessary to obtain a limited license. That upon application of any person already partially qualified by prior experience, the Commission may waive the 35 maximum age limit and may vary the time requirements for the time period of such apprenticeship.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§ 76A-43.
Pilotage association.

In consideration that a mutual association for pilots has been formed, is operational and is expedient for effective management, the Commission shall recognize such a proper pilot association formed for the smooth business transactions in the provision of services. However, the Commission may prescribe such reasonable rules and regulations for the governance of such associations in its direct relationship with the Commission as it deems necessary. Any licensed pilot refusing to become a member of such association shall be subject to suspension or have his license revoked, at the discretion of the Commission.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§ 76A-44.
Number of pilots.

The Commission shall govern the number of pilots necessary to maintain an efficient pilotage service. Present active pilots shall continue to serve with the Commission’s power of reduction to be effective only in the case of natural attrition except as provided in

G.S. 76A-45

. Docking masters shall not be deemed pilots for this section or any other section in this Subchapter.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§ 76A-45.
Pilot retirement.

The Commission shall have and is hereby given authority in its discretion and under such reasonable rules and regulations as it may prescribe to retire from active service any pilot who shall become physically or mentally unfit to perform a pilot’s duties. Provided, however, that no pilot shall be retired, except with his consent for physical or mental disability unless and until such pilots shall have first been examined by the public health officer or county physician of his respective county of residence and such public health officer or physician shall have certified to the board the fact of such physical or mental disability.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§ 76A-46.
Compulsory use of pilots.

Every foreign vessel and every United States vessel sailing under register, including such vessels towing or being towed when underway or docking in the waters of the Morehead City Harbor and Beaufort Bar, either incoming or outgoing, and over 60 gross tons, shall employ and utilize a State licensed pilot. Every foreign vessel sailing including such vessels towing or being towed when underway or docking in the Morehead City to Aurora water route, and over 60 gross tons, shall employ and utilize a State licensed pilot. Any master of a vessel violating this section by failing to use a State licensed pilot shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor except as provided for in

G.S. 76A-54

.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1; 1985, c. 517, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 578; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 45; c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 76A-47.
Pilotage rates.

The Commission shall set charges for pilotage services on a published tariff basis to be reviewed and revised annually as necessary. The initial publication of rates shall be those now in effect and subsequent revisions shall be preceded by public notice at least 30 days prior to publication. The rates may be based on the method chosen by the Commission and may be varied on a geographic or other basis which the Commission deems appropriate. In establishing pilotages’ rates, the Commission shall consider, but not be limited to, factors such as vessels’ lengths, tonnage, vessels’ drafts, general design of vessels, distances for which pilotage services are to be provided, nature of waters to be traversed and the rates for comparable pilotage services in other ports.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§ 76A-48.
Vessels not liable for pilotage.

Any vessel, for reasons of safety, coming in from sea for harborage without assistance of a pilot, the wind and weather being such that such pilot assistance or service could not have been reasonably and safely given, shall not be liable for pilotage inward from sea.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.

§§ 76A-49 through 76A-53.

Reserved for future codification purposes.